District of Columbia statutes.
47-1269

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply as of the effective date of final rules implementing a case mix reimbursement methodology issued pursuant to [§ 4-204.62(b)], or as of April 1, 2005, whichever is later.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5202(c), 51 DCR 8441

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5202(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Emergency Legislation